Washington statutes.
RCW 40.16.010

Injury to public record.

Every person who shall willfully and unlawfully remove, alter, mutilate, destroy, conceal, or obliterate a record, map, book, paper, document, or other thing filed or deposited in a public office, or with any public officer, by authority of law, is guilty of a class C felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than five years, or by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars, or by both.

[ 2003 c 53 s 214; 1992 c 7 s 34; 1909 c 249 s 95; RRS s 2347.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.